Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3135.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2889, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2889. A. Homesteads, as defined in Section 2888 of
this title, are hereby classified for the purpose of taxation as
provided in Section 22 of Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution.
All homesteads in this state shall be assessed for taxation the same
as other real property therein, except that each homestead, as
defined by Section 2801 et seq. of this title, shall be exempted
from all forms of ad valorem taxation to the extent of One Thousand

Req. No. 14422 Page 1

Doll ars ($1,000.00) Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) of the assessed
valuation.
B. In addition to the exemption provided for in subsection A of
this section, homesteads exempt from ad valorem taxation under this
section shall be further exempted from all forms of ad valorem
taxation to the extent of Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000.00) of the
assessed valuation if the following conditions are satisfied:
1. For tax year 2027 and subsequent tax years, the county
excise board in the county in which a homestead is located certifies
that the current tax year's ad valorem revenue collections exceed
the prior tax year's ad valorem revenue collections by at least five
percent (5%); and
2. For tax year 2027 and subsequent tax years, the board of
county commissioners in the county in which a homestead is located,
upon receipt of certification from the county excise board, approves
the additional exemption from ad valorem taxation.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective January 1, 2027.

60-2-14422 AO 12/15/25





Req. No. 14422 Page 2